Idaho statutes. Title 61 PUBLIC UTILITY REGULATION
Chapter 5 POWERS AND DUTIES OF PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
§ 61-538. Pole attachments — Regulation.

As used in this section, the term “public utility” includes any person, firm or corporation except a publicly owned utility which owns or controls poles, ducts, conduits or rights-of-way used or useful, in whole or in part, for wire communication, and which are not subject to the jurisdiction of the commission under section 61-129, Idaho Code.

The term “cable television company” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint-stock association, and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or personal representative thereof, which transmits television signals for distribution to subscribers of its services for a fee by means of wires or cables connecting its distribution facilities with the customer’s television receiver or the customer’s equipment connecting to the customer’s receiver rather than by transmission of the television signal through the air.

The term “pole attachment” when used in this section means any wire or cable for the transmission of cable television, and any related device, apparatus, or auxiliary equipment, installed upon any pole or in any telegraph corporation, telephone corporation, electrical corporation or communications right-of-way, duct, conduit or other similar facilities owned or controlled, in whole or in part, by one or more public utilities.

The legislature hereby finds that many public utilities have, through a course of conduct covering many years, made available space on and in their poles, ducts, conduits, and other support structures for use by the cable television industry for pole attachment service, and that the provision of such pole attachment service by such public utilities is and has been a public utility service.

Whenever a public utility and a cable television company are unable to agree upon the rates, terms or conditions for pole attachments or the terms, conditions or cost of production of space needed for pole attachments, then the commission shall establish and regulate the rates, terms and conditions, and cost of providing space needed for pole attachments so as to assure a public utility the recovery of not less than all the additional costs of providing and maintaining pole attachments nor more than the associated capital cost and operating expenses of the public utility attributable to that portion of the pole, duct, or conduit used for the pole attachment including a share of the required support and clearance space. In determining and fixing the rates, terms and conditions, the commission shall consider the interest of the customers of the attaching cable television company, the public utility upon which the attachment is made as well as the customers of the public utility. To the extent applicable, the procedures set forth in title 61, Idaho Code, shall apply under the provisions of this section.

§ 61-539. Water rights of an electrical corporation — No commission jurisdiction.

The commission shall have no power or jurisdiction to make any determination, decision, rule, demand, requirement, or issue any order or decree involving or related to the failure or refusal of an electrical corporation to protect its hydropower water rights from depletion or loss to (1) junior priority consumptive water uses for any consumptive purpose prior to November 19, 1982, (2) junior priority consumptive water uses for irrigation where substantial investments in irrigation wells and irrigation equipment were made prior to November 19, 1982, but were not operating in 1982, and (3) junior priority consumptive water uses for domestic, nonconsumptive commercial, nonconsumptive industrial or nonconsumptive municipal uses occurring from and after November 19, 1982.

This section shall apply not only to future proceedings concerning claims the cause for which arose prior to November 19, 1982, but also to proceedings pending before the commission at the time this act becomes effective, and any claims which might be asserted against the electrical corporation for depletions from uses within (1), (2) or (3) above.

§ 61-540. Authorizing negotiation and execution of contracts by the state of Idaho with electrical corporations regarding certain water rights identified in section 61-539, Idaho Code.

The governor of the state of Idaho or his designee is hereby empowered to negotiate and the governor to execute a contract on behalf of the state of Idaho with any electrical corporation which has filed or may file suit against water users or possible water users, said electrical corporation seeking to stop junior prior consumptive water uses as a result of Idaho Supreme Court Opinion No. 13794 in “Idaho Power Company vs. State of Idaho, et al,” filed November 19, 1982. Each contract shall provide, among other things, that (1) all consumptive water users who have beneficially used water for any consumptive purpose prior to November 19, 1982, or any person or persons who have previously made substantial investments in irrigation wells and irrigation equipment and have pending a water permit or application, even though such irrigation wells and irrigation equipment were not in operation prior to November 19, 1982, may continue the water licensing process, (2) persons included within the provisions of (1) above are third party beneficiaries of said contract, (3) the electrical corporation shall, where any suit is pending in which a person is within the class of consumptive users identified in (1) above, move the court for the dismissal from the suit of such person or persons, (4) said contract shall be conditional upon the passage and approval of this act but shall terminate if section 61-539 or 61-540 [this section], Idaho Code, be subsequently amended or repealed, and (5) in the event this act be amended or repealed, the defenses of statute of limitations, abandonment, adverse possession, statutory forfeiture, latches [laches], waiver, estoppel and other applicable common law defenses shall not be available against said electrical corporation following said contract termination for a period of two (2) years, unless the parties mutually consent to keep said contract in effect by addendum.

§ 61-541. Binding ratemaking treatments applicable when costs of a new electric generation facility are included in rates.

As used in this section, “certificate” means a certificate of convenience and necessity issued under section 61-526, Idaho Code.

A public utility that proposes to construct, lease or purchase an electric generation facility or transmission facility, or make major additions to an electric generation or transmission facility, may file an application with the commission for an order specifying in advance the ratemaking treatments that shall apply when the costs of the proposed facility are included in the public utility’s revenue requirements for ratemaking purposes. For purposes of this section, the requested ratemaking treatments may include nontraditional ratemaking treatments or nontraditional cost recovery mechanisms.

In its application for an order under this section, a public utility shall describe the need for the proposed facility, how the public utility addresses the risks associated with the proposed facility, the proposed date of the lease or purchase or commencement of construction, the public utility’s proposal for cost recovery, and any proposed ratemaking treatments to be applied to the proposed facility.

For purposes of this section, ratemaking treatments for a proposed facility include but are not limited to:

The return on common equity investment or method of determining the return on common equity investment;

The depreciation life or schedule;

The maximum amount of costs that the commission will include in rates at the time determined by the commission without the public utility having the burden of moving forward with additional evidence of the prudence and reasonableness of such costs;

The method of handling any variances between cost estimates and actual costs; and

The treatment of revenues received from wholesale purchasers of service from the proposed facility.

The commission shall hold a public hearing on the application submitted by the public utility under this section. The commission may hold its hearing in conjunction with an application for a certificate.

Based upon the hearing record, the commission shall issue an order that addresses the proposed ratemaking treatments. The commission may accept, deny or modify a proposed ratemaking treatment requested by the utility. In determining the proposed ratemaking treatments, the commission shall maintain a fair, just and reasonable balance of interests between the requesting utility and the utility’s ratepayers.

In reviewing the application, the commission shall also determine whether:

The public utility has in effect a commission-accepted integrated resource plan;

The services and operations resulting from the facility are in the public interest and will not be detrimental to the provision of adequate and reliable electric service;

The public utility has demonstrated that it has considered other sources for long-term electric supply or transmission;

The addition of the facility is reasonable when compared to energy efficiency, demand-side management and other feasible alternative sources of supply or transmission; and
(v) The public utility participates in a regional transmission planning process.

The commission shall use its best efforts to issue the order setting forth the applicable ratemaking treatments prior to the date of the proposed lease, acquisition or commencement of construction of the facility.

The ratemaking treatments specified in the order issued under this section shall be binding in any subsequent commission proceedings regarding the proposed facility that is the subject of the order, except as may otherwise be established by law.

The commission may not require a public utility to apply for an order under this section.

The commission may promulgate rules or issue procedural orders for the purpose of administering this section.